Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 5
INVESTMENTS - INSURANCE

31-30.5-501. Old hire pension fund - investments.

It is lawful for the board of trustees of the old hire firefighters' pension fund and the board of trustees of the old hire police officers' pension fund in any municipality or district in this state to invest such respective pension funds, or any part thereof, in the name of the treasurer of such municipality or in the name of a custodian or custodians appointed by the board, as provided for in this section, in interest-bearing obligations of the United States, in interest-bearing bonds of the state of Colorado, or in general obligation bonds of cities, whether organized under general law or article XX of the state constitution, or in any depository enumerated in section 24-75-603, C.R.S., and secured as provided in articles 10.5 and 47 of title 11, C.R.S. The board of trustees, by written resolution, may appoint one or more persons to act as custodians, in addition to the treasurer, to deposit or cause to be deposited all or part of such funds in any state or national bank or any state or federally chartered savings and loan association in Colorado. Such persons shall give surety bonds in such amounts and form and for such purposes as the board requires. All such securities and evidences of investment shall be deposited with the treasurer of such municipality.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 878, § 1, effective May 23.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-701.

31-30.5-502. Insurance - investment by banks and trust companies.

Notwithstanding any restrictions on investments of old hire police officers' or firefighters' pension funds contained in any laws of this state, it is lawful for the board of trustees of any such pension fund, with the consent in writing of a majority of the active old hire members of the police department or fire department for the benefit of which the pension fund is maintained, to:

Insure the old hire members of any such police department or fire department by the purchase of policies of individual, group, or blanket life, endowment, disability, or annuity insurance, or variable annuity insurance in and from companies authorized to do business in Colorado and to expend any portion of such pension fund for the purpose of paying the premiums on any such insurance policies; or

Establish a noninsured trust pension plan with a bank or trust company authorized to exercise trust powers in this state as trustee, invested by the trustee pursuant to the provisions of part 3 of article 1 of title 15, C.R.S.; but the trustee shall at all times hold fixed income obligations having a book value or cost of not less than sixty percent of the total contributions made to the trust less the amounts paid out.

If any old hire member of such police department, fire department, or association is receiving any pension, benefit, or award made prior to April 9, 1965, by such board of trustees, no such part of said fund shall be expended for purchasing said insurance as will impair the ability of said fund to meet the requirements of such pensions, benefits, and awards. The board of trustees of the old hire pension fund shall be the beneficiary of any such insurance policies, and the proceeds thereof shall be paid to the board of trustees as an addition to the old hire pension fund.

Source:

L. 96

Entire article added with relocations, p. 878, § 1, effective May 23.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-702.

31-30.5-503. Alternative investment authority.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part 5, moneys of old hire pension plans that are not affiliated with the fire and police pension association under section 31-31-701 may be managed and invested by the trustees of such plans pursuant to the standard and other provisions for trustees set forth in the "Colorado Uniform Prudent Investor Act", article 1.1 of title 15, C.R.S. Such investments shall be audited at least biennially.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 879, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 10, § 1, effective March 13.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1203, § 73, effective August 4.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-1012 (8)(a).